District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.12

Recognition of order modified in another state.

If a child-support order issued by a tribunal of the District is modified by a tribunal of another state which assumed jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, a tribunal of the District:

(1)

May enforce its order that was modified only as to arrears and interest accruing before the modification;

(2)

May provide appropriate relief for violations of its order which occurred before the effective date of the modification; and

(3)

Shall recognize the modifying order of the other state, upon registration, for the purpose of enforcement.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 612, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(f)(10), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-346.12.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote the section.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 612 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).